Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB151.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) On July 1, 2025, the secretary of health and
environment shall request a waiver from the United States centers for
medicare and medicaid services to end participation in the following
expenditure authorities under the KanCare demonstration, (No. 11-W-
00283/7), approved January 1, 2024, pursuant to section 1115(a) of the
federal social security act:
(1) Expenditures for additional services for individuals with
behavioral health needs;
(2) residential and inpatient treatment for individuals with substance
use disorder;
(3) continuous eligibility period for parents and other caretaker
relatives; and
(4) continuous coverage for individuals aging out of the children's
health insurance program (CHIP).
(b) If the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services
grants the waiver requested under subsection (a), the secretary of health
and environment shall immediately end participation in such expenditures
authorities in accordance with such waiver. If no waiver under subsection
(a) is granted by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid
services, the secretary shall request such a waiver annually until such
waiver is granted.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.